Maine, session 132, LD155.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6502 is enacted to read:
§6502. Access to menstrual products
A school administrative unit shall require its schools that serve students in any of
grades 6 to 12 to make available menstrual products to students at no cost in all school
bathrooms. For purposes of this section, "menstrual products" means tampons and sanitary
pads used with respect to menstruation.